Hawaii, session 2026, HB64.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 293, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§293- Low-speed electric bicycles; sales.  (a) No person shall sell or offer for sale a bicycle equipped with a motor except a low-speed electric bicycle. (b) Any person selling a low-speed electric bicycle shall provide each purchaser with educational materials that explain the safe operation and applicable laws and regulations governing the use of low-speed electric bicycles; provided that the department of transportation shall make available to any person selling one or more low-speed electric bicycles any educational materials to be provided pursuant to this subsection. (c)  As used in this section, "low-speed electric bicycle" shall have the same meaning as in title 15 United States Code section 2085." SECTION 2.  Section 291C-143.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§291C-143.5[]]  Low-speed electric bicycles; operator age.  No person under the age of [fifteen] sixteen shall operate a low-speed electric bicycle as defined under title 15 United States Code section 2085." SECTION 3.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________